Maine, session 132, LD927.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1056 is enacted to read:
§1056. School chaplains
1. School chaplains. A school administrative unit shall employ or accept as a
volunteer one or more chaplains to provide support, services and programs as assigned by
the school board of that school administrative unit for students, staff and parents of students
of the school administrative unit.
2. Qualifications. A school chaplain under this section:
A. Must be certified, licensed or ordained by a faith organization recognized by the
United States Department of Defense;
B. Must consent to be fingerprinted and submit to a criminal background check under
Title 22, chapter 1691;
C. May not be registered as a sex offender under Title 34-A, chapter 15 or 17 or a
comparable registry in another jurisdiction; and
D. Is not required to be certified under chapter 501 or 502.
3. Limitation of liability. Except for an act or statement maliciously, willfully and
deliberately intended to cause harm or intimidate a person seeking support, services or
programs under subsection 1, a cause of action may not be maintained against a school
chaplain for any act taken or statement made in providing support, services or programs
under this section.